sv: Hiv-testgeneration: 2:a generationen; 3:e generationen; 4:e generationen; 5:e generationen; Övrigt
es: Generación de prueba de VIH: 2da generación; 3ra generación; 4ta generación; 5ta generación; Otros
bg-BG: Поколение HIV тест: 2-ро поколение; 3-то поколение; 4-то поколение; 5-то поколение; Други
it: Generazione del test HIV: 2ª generazione; 3ª generazione; 4ª generazione; 5ª generazione; Altro
en: HIV test generation: 2nd generation; 3rd generation; 4th generation; 5th generation; Other
pl: Generacja testu HIV: 2. generacja; 3. generacja; 4. generacja; 5. generacja; Inne
tr: HIV test nesli: 2. nesil; 3. nesil; 4. nesil; 5. nesil; Diğer
zh-TW: HIV 檢測世代: 第二代; 第三代; 第四代; 第五代; 其他
ru: Поколение теста на ВИЧ: 2-е поколение; 3-е поколение; 4-е поколение; 5-е поколение; Другой
ko: HIV 검사 세대: 2세대; 3세대; 4세대; 5세대; 기타
sl-SI: Generacija testa za HIV: 2. generacija; 3. generacija; 4. generacija; 5. generacija; Drugo
da: HIV-testgeneration: 2. generation; 3. generation; 4. generation; 5. generation; Andet
zh-CN: HIV 检测代次: 第二代; 第三代; 第四代; 第五代; 其他
lt-LT: ŽIV testo karta: 2-os kartos; 3-ios kartos; 4-os kartos; 5-os kartos; Kita
pt-BR: Geração do teste de HIV: 2ª geração; 3ª geração; 4ª geração; 5ª geração; Outro
vi: Thế hệ xét nghiệm HIV: Thế hệ thứ 2; Thế hệ thứ 3; Thế hệ thứ 4; Thế hệ thứ 5; Khác
fi: HIV-testin sukupolvi: 2. sukupolvi; 3. sukupolvi; 4. sukupolvi; 5. sukupolvi; Muu
nb: HIV-testgenerasjon: 2. generasjon; 3. generasjon; 4. generasjon; 5. generasjon; Annet
fr: Génération de test VIH: 2e génération; 3e génération; 4e génération; 5e génération; Autre
hr-HR: Generacija HIV testa: 2. generacija; 3. generacija; 4. generacija; 5. generacija; Ostalo
sk-SK: Generovanie testov na HIV: 2. generácia; 3. generácia; 4. generácia; 5. generácia; Iné
ja: HIV検査世代: 第2世代; 第3世代; 第4世代; 第5世代; その他
th: รุ่นการทดสอบเอชไอวี: รุ่นที่ 2; รุ่นที่ 3; รุ่นที่ 4; รุ่นที่ 5; อื่นๆ
nl: HIV-testgeneratie: 2e generatie; 3e generatie; 4e generatie; 5e generatie; Andere
el: Γενιά τεστ HIV: 2ης γενιάς; 3ης γενιάς; 4ης γενιάς; 5ης γενιάς; Άλλο
cs: Generace HIV testu: 2. generace; 3. generace; 4. generace; 5. generace; Jiné
de: HIV-Testgeneration: 2. Generation; 3. Generation; 4. Generation; 5. Generation; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Generație test HIV: Generația a 2-a; Generația a 3-a; Generația a 4-a; Generația a 5-a; Altele
pt-PT: Geração do teste de HIV: 2ª geração; 3ª geração; 4ª geração; 5ª geração; Outro
hu: HIV-tesztgeneráció: 2. generáció; 3. generáció; 4. generáció; 5. generáció; Egyéb